Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1595.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Abrogation of Heavy-Duty Diesel Emissions Control Program Regulations Act.Section 2. Abrogation of regulations.The provisions of 25 Pa. Code Ch. 126 Subch. E (relating to Pennsylvania Heavy-Duty Diesel Emissions Control Program) are abrogated.Section 3. Federal standards.As a result of the abrogation under section 2, the Federal standards for heavy-duty diesel vehicles and engines shall apply in this Commonwealth.Section 4. Effective date.1234567891011121314151617 This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1595PN1907 - 2 - 1